Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.290

Personal financial affairs statements—Commission members—Charter school board members.

(1) Members of the commission must file personal financial affairs statements with the public disclosure commission.

(2) Members of a charter school board must file personal financial affairs statements with the public disclosure commission.

[ 2016 c 241 s 130.]